Utah statutes.
48-2c-1513.   Application of Part 15.

Where a conflict arises between the provisions of this part and the other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this part shall control.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

